Thrivent Mutual FundsVoice: Is Now the Time to Consider Actively-Managed Funds?   Investing #​{{::display_hashtag}}  Investing #​{{::display_hashtag}} {{article.article.pretty_date}} {{article.metrics.page_views}}     Edit Post{{circ_link.title}} Is Now the Time to Consider Actively-Managed Funds?{{article.article.images.featured.caption}}Most Read{{contrib_block.display_advoice_brand}} {{contrib_block.display_voice_type}}{{contrib_block.display_author.name}}Voice With {{contrib_block.authors[0].blogName}} Thrivent Mutual Funds ,  {{contrib_block.display_author.type}}   Contributor {{contrib_block.display_author.type}} Contributor   Opinions expressed by Forbes Contributors are their own.Full profile →'">The author is a Forbes contributor. The opinions expressed are those of the writer.Loading ...Loading ...This story appears in the {{article.article.magazine.pretty_date}} issue of {{article.article.magazine.pubName}}. SubscribeBy Gene Walden, Senior Finance Editor, and Jeffrey Branstad, CFA, Senior Investment Product Strategist, Thrivent Mutual Funds

No question, index funds have enjoyed strong performance the past seven years during the second longest bull market run in U.S. history. But if the market should stumble under the weight of the recent tepid economic conditions and the prospect of rising interest rates, a new Thrivent Mutual Funds Active vs. Passive Study, suggests that investors in index funds may be well served to consider switching their dollars to actively-managed funds.
The study shows that during the two market crashes of the 21st Century, the S&P 5001 significantly trailed actively-managed large cap no-load funds.  In fact, as the following graphs demonstrate, the index wouldn’t even have ranked in the top 50% in terms of performance during a single 12-month stretch of the Dot-Com Crash of 2000 – 2003, and would have trailed its peer group during 93.1% of the Global Financial Crisis of 2007 – 2009:

In fact, as the next graph shows, the index trailed the universe of actively-managed large cap no-load  funds the majority of the time over the entire course of the volatile decade of 2000 through 2009.


The S&P 500 is not the only index to experience sub-par performance relative to actively-managed funds during bear markets and extended periods. The study also focused on the Russell 2000 Index2  of small stocks.
While the Russell 2000 has done well versus the actively-managed fund universe during most of the recent bull market, it would have ranked in the bottom (4th) quartile of the small cap category during 90.3% of the 31 rolling 12-month periods of the Dot-Com Crash. In fact, the index would have ranked in the bottom half of corresponding actively-managed, no-load funds the majority of the time over the past 25 years, dating back to 1992, as the following chart shows.
Why Now?
If you’re concerned that the long bull market run is winding down or that the recent rise in interest rates will continue, or if you’re apprehensive about the uncertainty of a new administration, this may be the time to consider switching from index funds to actively-managed funds. While past performance is no guarantee of future results, as the Thrivent Mutual Funds Active vs. Passive Study demonstrated, the no-load actively-managed funds in the study have done a better job of limiting losses than their corresponding indexes during the recent bear markets and volatile market stretches.
To achieve even greater diversification, investors may consider actively-managed asset allocation funds, which offer broad diversification across multiple asset classes.  While diversification does not eliminate risk, it generally helps reduce losses during steep stock market declines.
Here are several other reasons to consider switching to actively-managed funds:

Flexibility. Some managed funds have done better than index funds during down markets due, in part, we believe, to the fact that fund managers have had the ability to make some adjustments in their portfolios to reduce the stocks or sectors that appear the most problematic. Investment managers can also use risk management techniques and diversification that seek to provide similar returns to the market with lower risk and volatility.
Help when needed most. A rising tide lifts all boats. Ever since the Federal Reserve launched quantitative easing activities intended to stabilize the economy and lower interest rates, all of that extra capital in the system has flowed to equities across the board, boosting market returns while greatly increasing correlations among stocks. That means that all equities, even stocks that many active managers think are unattractive, have generally gone up together, with higher risk companies that carry more debt on their books actually leading the way as the low interest rates have distorted the risks inherent in holding too much debt.

That’s been an advantage for index funds, since they own all equities, even those presumably “higher risk” stocks that active managers are avoiding. But while an index fund may (or may not) offer better returns in a bull market, active managers tend to provide their greatest value during bear markets when investors need their help the most. Normally, and particularly so in bear markets, stocks experience a wide variety of rates of return, meaning that index funds will be exposed to both the good performers and the bad, while active managers have a better opportunity to avoid those bad performers.

A better chance to beat the market. The fact is index funds perpetually trail the market by a small margin. Their costs, while minimal, create a small differential between the market performance and their own returns. As the study demonstrates, in any given year, actively-managed funds can, and have, outperformed the market.
Active funds have responded by lowering fees. Actively-managed mutual funds have responded to the low fees of index funds by lowering their own fees over the past 20 years. According to the Investment Company Institute, the average equity mutual fund expense ratio was 1.08% in 1994 and dropped to just 0.68% in 2015.3 The lower fees would add, on average, about 0.40% per year to the returns of actively-managed funds. All other expenses remaining the same, in general, lowering fees results in an increase to the total returns of equity mutual funds.
Limiting market losses can speed up your recovery. Actively managed funds may not always cut your losses, but if you are successful in reducing your losses in a down market through an actively-managed fund, the road to recovery becomes much easier. In fact, the bigger the loss, the more difficult it becomes to recover from that loss. For instance, for a 5% loss, you would need a gain of 5.26% to restore your portfolio to its previous level. But with a 20% loss, you would need a gain of 25% to get back to even; a 30% loss would require a gain of 42.9% to fully recover; and a 50% loss would require a 100% gain to bring the portfolio back to its previous level.

In terms of pure long-term performance, index funds may (or may not) have a slight edge. But when the chips are down and the markets are reeling, the Thrivent Mutual Funds study suggests that you may be better served to have an active manager in your corner making the crucial decisions.
Results
The tables below summarize some of the key results of the study during the Dot-Com Crash, the Global Financial Crisis and the decade of 2000 – 2010.
The table headings include: Lipper funds category (“large cap core” or “small cap core”), Index (S&P 500 or Russell 2000), the four performance quartiles (the higher the percentage the worse the relative performance), and the Average Percentile Ranking.
The Average Percentile Ranking is not tied to the quartile rankings, and provides a different vantage point on the comparative performance. It measures the average percentile of how they ranked over the given period of time. As with the quartile rankings, a lower percentage indicates better performance while a higher percentage indicates worse performance. For example, in the Dot-Com Crash table below, the average percentage of the S&P 500 was 70.6%, which put it in the bottom 30% among all funds in that category.  The Russell 2000 Index fared even worse with an 81.9% average percentage – which means it would have ranked in the bottom 18.1% of funds in the small cap category.
In the following charts, please keep in mind that the 1st quartile represents the best performance and the 4th quartile represents the worst. For example, in the first table entitled “Dot-Com Crash,” you will see “0.0%” in the 1st and 2nd quartiles for each of the two indexes. That indicates that neither the S&P 500 nor the Russell 2000 would have ranked in the top half (1st or 2nd quartiles) in performance in their respective actively-managed no-load fund groups during a single 12-month period from Sept. 31, 2000 through March 31, 2003.

To read the complete report, with full research and ranking methodology and expanded findings, go to Thrivent Mutual Funds Active vs. Passive Study.

All information as of December 1, 2016 unless otherwise noted.
This is a sponsored advertisement by Thrivent Mutual Funds. For more information or the prospectus, visit ThriventFunds.com.
A variation of this article was posted on ThriventFunds.com.
Thrivent Mutual Funds offers a family of 21 mutual funds actively-managed by our more than 100 investment professionals.  Investors can choose to build their own diversified portfolio with a combination of Thrivent Equity Funds and Thrivent Fixed Income Funds, or let us do it for them with one of our diversified Thrivent Asset Allocation Funds or Thrivent Income Plus Funds.

Past performance does not guarantee future results. Any indexes shown are unmanaged and do not reflect the typical costs of investing. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investing in a mutual fund involves risks, including the possible loss of principal. The prospectus contains more complete information on the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the fund, which investors should read and consider carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available from a Thrivent Financial representative or at ThriventFunds.com.

The principal underwriter for the Thrivent Mutual Funds is Thrivent Distributors, LLC. Thrivent Distributors, LLC is a registered broker/dealer and member of FINRA with its principal place of business at 625 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis, MN 55415.
The views expressed are solely those of the authors and are not necessarily those of Thrivent Financial or any of its affiliates, including Thrivent Asset Management, the investment adviser for Thrivent Mutual Funds, and Thrivent Distributors, LLC.  Both Thrivent Asset Management and Thrivent Distributors, LLC are wholly-owned subsidiaries of Thrivent Financial.
The views expressed are as of the date given, may change as market or other conditions change, and may differ from views expressed by Thrivent Asset Management associates.  Actual investment decisions made by Thrivent Asset Management will not necessarily reflect the views expressed herein.  This information should not be considered investment advice or a recommendation of any particular security, strategy or product.

1. The S&P 500® Index is a market-cap weighted index that represents the average performance of a group of 500 large-capitalization stocks. Investors cannot invest directly in an index. An index is unmanaged and an investment cannot be made directly in an index. 2. The Russell 2000 is described by FTSE Russell as the 2,000 stocks that rank in size (market capitalization) from the 1,001st largest U.S. stock through the 3000th largest U.S. stock. 3. Fee rate study conducted by Investment Company Institute; released March 2016  (https://www.ici.org/pressroom/news/16_news_trends_expenses)
Start Gallery Page {{article.article.page + 1}} / {{article.article.pages.length}} Continue {{article.article.calledOutCommentCount||''}}Comment on this storyPrintSend Us FeedbackReport CorrectionsReprints & PermissionsTrending on Forbes {{channel_name}}false 


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Thrivent Asset Management LLC






























































Research Hub




Sign In











Sign In


New Account



About Macroaxis


Settings


Plans & Pricing



 Toggle Menu


 Toggle Fullscreen







   Markets




Equities




Portfolios




Stories






×











 My Equities
Investing Ideas

Free Tools

World Markets Map
Cryptocurrency Center
Equity Research
Company Directory
Insider Directory
Buy or Sell Recommendation
Pair Correlation
Stocks Correlation
Pattern Recognition
Watchlist Analysis



 Services

Technology Overview
Solution Methodology
Acknowledgement
Product Tour
FAQs



 About Us

About Macroaxis
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
Advertising



Sign In   DOW   21,797  0.39% Spirent CommunicationsTelit CommunicationsK3 BusinessMaximilian Vermorken






World
US















Thrivent Asset Management LLC

  
		


 
		




Companies in United States
Insiders
Advisers
Ideas
Correlations
Volatility
News
Funds
ETFs
Crypto










	Upgrade to remove ads 





User TypeAdvisorEntity NameThrivent Asset Management LLCSEC Registration # Minimum Invetsment Required0.0Assets Under Managment$ 13.97 B Contact Details LocationMinneapolis, MinnesotaAddress Postal Code CountryUnited StatesPhone Fax Web Sitehttp://www.thrivent.com




Sign In
	
				 to check out Thrivent-Asset-Management-LLC and other financial advisors in the area. 							
		
				 As a registered user you will also get following benefit from Macroaxis membership: 							
					
				





							
								 Best Portfolio Management and Performance Monitoring Solution on Internet.
								









								 Easy to use Portfolio Optimization Tools which money managers have used for years.
								









								 Know your risk and identify high risk, low return stocks in your portfolio.
								







Get Started With Macroaxis




You May Also Consider Name Location  Net Rating  Silveroak Wealth Management LLC Minneapolis MN 0 Minneapolis Portfolio Management Gr Minneapolis MN 0 Defined Contribution Advisors Inc Minneapolis MN 0 White Pine Capital LLC Minneapolis MN 0 Family Wealth Counselors  LLC. Minneapolis MN 0 Mcfee Financial Group  Inc. Minneapolis MN 0 Sit Fremont Capital Funds LLC Minneapolis MN 0 Windsor Financial Group LLC Minneapolis MN 0 Palisade Investment Advisors  LLC Minneapolis MN 0 Thrivent Asset Management LLC Minneapolis MN 0


Financial advisors use their knowledge of investments, 
tax laws, and insurance to recommend financial options to individuals.
The SEC typically regulates investment advisers that have assets under management in excess of $25,000,000. Investment advisers that do not meet this threshold generally are regulated by the states. The SEC registers IA firms but does not separately register individual representatives of IA firms. The states register IA firms, and many separately register individual investment adviser representatives.

Currently, you can only search for IA firms on this website. In the future, this website also will provide the ability to search for individual investment adviser representatives.

In 1996 Congress amended the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 to require that the SEC establish a readily accessible electronic process to respond to public inquiries about investment advisers and their disciplinary information. The SEC created this website to satisfy Congress? mandate. 


		Refer to the following references to for additional information before selecting your Financial Advisor
			
IARD    Investment Adviser Registration Depository
Investment Adviser Search    Search for an Investment Adviser Firm
U.S. Department of Labor: Financial Advisors    Bureau of Labor Statistics: Financial Advisors
FINRA    Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
AAFM    American Academy of Financial Management
CFP    Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards
FPA    Financial Planning Association









OpportunitiesExplore Investment OpportunitiesBuild portfolios using Macroaxis predefined set of investing ideas. Many of Macroaxis investing ideas can easily outperform a given market. Ideas can also be optimized per your risk profile before portfolio origination is invoked. Explore Investing Ideas  Fix All your PortfoliosBy capturing your risk tolerance and investment horizon Macroaxis technology of instant portfolio optimization will compute exactly how much risk is acceptable for your desired return expectationsFix your portfolios for free








Updating Transaction...
	






	Report was successfully generated
	



































































































			© 2017 Macroaxis LLC All rights reserved  
		








Insiders
Companies
Contact Us
Feedback
Widgets










































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Thrivent Funds | Thrivent Mutual Funds














































Skip to main content














RECIPIENT OF LIPPER MUTUAL FUND AWARDS FOR 2017
LEARN MORE







"Today is the dayI start investing."
Open an account foras little as $50/month.

Get Started










Sophisticated Investments, Made Surprisingly Simple






Thrivent Mutual Funds offers 23 actively managed funds spanning many major asset categories. They have no loads.* And the most impressive thing about them might be how simple they are for you. 






Asset Allocation FundsIncome Plus FundsEquity FundsFixed Income Funds









Account Types For Things That Matter


Retirement



Rollovers


Kids


Life Goals











A Happy Retirement Starts with a Smart Approach
You want a comfortable retirement. We have the tools to help you get there. Retirement accounts through Thrivent Mutual Funds can be part of building your nest egg for the long haul. We do this by offering three things:



The potential for growth with tax advantages



A variety of investment options



Earnings that can compound over time



Learn about our Retirement Accounts






Our Retirement Accounts


Traditional IRA

Traditional IRA
An individual retirement account in which contributions may be tax deductible. Earnings in your account accumulate tax deferred.  Distributions are taxed on withdrawal from the account.
Why it might be for you:

No Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) contribution limits
You think you will be in a lower tax bracket in retirement
You aren’t currently covered by an employer-sponsored plan

Learn moreLearn more about traditional IRAs



Roth IRA

Roth IRA
An individual retirement account to which you make after-tax contributions and if you meet certain qualifications, can take earnings out tax-free.
Why it might be for you:

Your 2016 adjusted gross income is less than $132,000 (2017: $133,000) for single tax filers or $194,000 (2017: $196,000) for joint filers
You think you will be in a higher tax bracket in retirement
You want to let your money remain invested as long as you want without being required to start withdrawals at a certain age

Learn moreLearn more about Roth IRAs








OPEN AN ACCOUNT
View our Mutual Funds


Consider This

Can’t choose? You may be able to contribute to both types of IRAs. Learn more in Traditional vs. Roth IRAs.














Simple is Putting All of Your Retirement Assets into One Place
The days of working for a single company your entire career have long passed. Chances are, you’ll have worked at a number of businesses by the time you retire. Which means that, like most people, you could have IRA and 401(k) assets scattered across several accounts and firms. Now may be the time to consider taking control of these important assets by rolling them into an IRA offered by Thrivent Mutual Funds.2 Potential benefits include:


Investment flexibility
Thrivent Mutual Funds provides a variety of investment options, some of which may not be available in your employer’s plan.
Easier management
When all of your retirement savings are in one place, it's easier to manage your accounts and monitor your progress.


Continue tax advantages
Like your 401(k) or other retirement plan, a Thrivent Mutual Fund IRA offers important tax benefits.
Of course, your best option may be to leave your assets where they are. Keep in mind that rolling over assets to an IRA is just one of multiple options for your retirement plan. 









Important Considerations





When considering moving your retirement assets it’s important to review your needs and circumstances, and consider the following factors:
Investment Options & Fees
Compare the options you currently have with those available with Thrivent Mutual Funds, including investment fees and other expenses.
Services Offered
Plans and providers potentially offer a variety of account services you may want. Compare current services and conveniences to those available with Thrivent Mutual Funds.
Distribution Flexibility
Both IRAs and employer-sponsored plans may offer distribution options you want or need. Compare access to early withdrawals, loans, employer stock considerations, required minimum distributions and distribution frequency.
Creditor protections
Generally, employer sponsored plans have unlimited protection from creditors under federal law. IRA assets are less protected and laws vary by state.
LEARN MORE



Options for Moving Assets

Options for Moving Assets
Have your employer-sponsored retirement plan assets sent directly to your Thrivent Mutual Funds IRA with a Direct Rollover.
Or, take receipt of your retirement assets and deposit them into your IRA within 60 days with an Indirect Rollover. Keep in mind you will incur a mandatory 20% tax withholding for distributions from employer qualified plans and you are limited to one indirect rollover per 12 month period for all your retirement assets.
With an IRA to IRA Transfer you can move your retirement assets from your current IRA to a Thrivent Mutual Fund IRA. 
If you’re looking at a Thrivent Mutual Fund Roth IRA, consider moving your retirement assets from your employer-sponsored plan or traditional IRA with a Roth IRA Conversion. You may have to pay federal or state income taxes on all or part of the conversion amount.
LEARN MORELink to Making Sense of Rollovers and Transfers.










Ready to Rollover?
Follow these simple steps to make it happen and start investing with Thrivent Mutual Funds.



Research and gather what’s needed from your current plan sponsor or IRA custodian.



Identify and set up a Thrivent Mutual Fund IRA for your assets.



Complete the rollover request form on-line or in paper.



Send the request to Thrivent Mutual Funds to initiate the movement of your assets.






2You can roll over assets from an employer-sponsored retirement plan to an IRA if you experience one of the following triggering events (as permitted by the plan document): termination of service, retirement, reaching age 59½, disability, plan termination, death, or proceeds received from former spouse’s retirement plan due to a divorce.





OPEN AN ACCOUNT
Learn more about Rollover Accounts
View our Mutual Funds













Invest in the Next Generation
Custodial and education accounts are a great way to look after future generations. We offer the tools you need to help take care of a kid’s future the same way you take care of your own.
Things to keep in mind:
 


Time is on your side.
One of your greatest assets is your time. Starting early in saving is critical to lessening the financial impact that may occur when college starts.


Once it’s theirs, it’s theirs.
When an account is created in a child’s name, the fund can only be used for that child’s benefit.


They could gain access at age 18.
Through the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act (UGMA) or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (UTMA), the child can access the money usually between the ages of 18-21.







Consider This

In 2015, the average student loan debt was $30,100 per borrower.
SOURCE: The Institute for College Access & Success    http://ticas.org/posd/map-state-data




Accounts for Kids


Coverdell Education Savings Account

Coverdell Education Savings Account
Grow money tax deferred and withdraw proceeds tax-free for qualified education expenses. And unlike 529 savings plans, a Coverdell account can be used towards qualified primary and secondary school costs in addition to college costs.
Learn moreLearn more about Coverdell Education Savings Accounts



Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (UTMA)

Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (UTMA)
Establish and manage an investment account for a child, for education or other qualified expenses. These accounts are irrevocable gifts that ensure the assets will be used to benefit a child. Since the money does not have a specified purpose, no penalties are imposed if used for something other than education. These accounts may previously have been referred to or known as Uniform Gifts to Minors (UGMAs).
Learn moreLearn more about UTMA Accounts








Open an account
Learn more about Custodial Accounts
View our Mutual Funds













When It Comes to Investing, It’s All About Options
When putting away money for a down payment on a car or house, or maybe just a rainy day fund, a general investment account may give you the flexibility you need. And who doesn’t want more flexibility?
















Save for something special
New home or home renovationBig ticket purchasesVacation and leisure
Prepare for the unexpected
Build emergency reservesCare for your family






Make your money work for you
Improve cash flowIncrease your savingsDevelop tax-efficient strategies
Give Back
Help your communitySupport causes that matter to youOpen a Donor Advised Fund through Infaith Community Foundation1















OPEN AN ACCOUNT
LEARN MORE ABOUT GENERAL INVESTMENT ACCOUNTS
View our Mutual Funds












Actively Managed By Real People. With Real Experience.
All Thrivent mutual funds are actively managed by a team of seasoned investment professionals. Sophisticated market analysis, backed by real-world experience. 
Meet the team


100+ 
Investment Professionals


23
Actively Managed Mutual Funds


$15B
in Assets (as of 12/31/16)





 
 














Market Update
2nd Quarter Market Recap: Wobbly Tech Sector Still Leads Market While Oil Keeps Skidding
July 5, 2017










Investing Essentials
The Risk of Avoiding Risk
June 27, 2017










Market Update
Medical Technology Conquering Many of Mankind’s Major Maladies
July 5, 2017


















Ready to Start?
Open an account



*Class S shares are no-load shares. Class A shares, which are not available for purchase on ThriventFunds.com, may have a front-end sales load. See the prospectus for more information.
1InFaith Community Foundation, while not an affiliate, is associated with Thrivent Mutual Funds and together provide services that support Thrivent Financial's overall mission.






X


You are now leaving the Thrivent Mutual Funds’ website and will be transferred to a website not owned or operated by Thrivent Mutual Funds. We recommend you review the privacy policy concerning the protection of your information on that website.


Continue
No thanks










Mutual Funds



Asset Allocation


Income Plus


Equity


Fixed Income


Fund Literature







Accounts



Retirement


Rollovers


General Investment


Kids


Business & Organization







Insights



Market Update


Retirement


Education


Mutual Funds 101


Investing Essentials







About Us



In The News


Getting to Know Us


Investing Your Way


How We Give Back


Leadership Team


Our Fund Managers







Support



FAQs


Tax Resources


Forms


Advisors







Thrivent Financial



Find a Financial Representative


Thrivent.com









Facebook

LinkedIn





Privacy & Security
Thrivent Mutual Funds © 2017. All Rights Reserved.



Call us. We're here to help. 1-800-847-4836 
Monday through Friday: 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. Central time.



 Check the background of Thrivent Distributors, LLC on FINRA's BrokerCheck.
Investing in a mutual fund involves risks, including the possible loss of principal. The prospectus and summary prospectus contain more complete information on the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the fund, and other information, which investors should read and consider carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available at ThriventFunds.com or by calling 1-800-847-4836.
This website is not intended as a source for legal, accounting or tax advice or services. Work with your attorney and/or tax professional for additional information.
The principal underwriter for the Thrivent Mutual Funds is Thrivent Distributors, LLC. No communication or content, including investment analysis tools and information about the Thrivent Mutual Funds, on this website is intended to provide investment advice or recommendations of any kind and may not be relied upon as such. The communication and content found on this website, including investment analysis tools and information about the Thrivent Mutual Funds, are not intended as a solicitation to buy or an offer to sell any security. Thrivent Distributors, LLC has undertaken no review of the individual circumstances of any investor and makes no representations with respect to the suitability of any investment for a particular investor. Any purchase, sale or redemption of the Thrivent Mutual Funds will be executed through Thrivent Financial Investor Services Inc., the transfer agent for the Thrivent Mutual Funds, and an affiliate of Thrivent Distributors, LLC. Asset management services provided by Thrivent Asset Management, LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, Appleton, WI.
Thrivent Distributors, LLC is a registered broker-dealer and member of FINRA with its principal place of business at 625 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis, MN 55415
Thrivent Financial Investor Services, Inc. (TFISI) is the transfer agent for Thrivent Mutual Funds and maintains and services shareholder accounts.  Pages on this website that include information about shareholder accounts are supported by the transfer agent.  
No communication or content on this website is intended to provide investment advice or recommendations of any kind and may not be relied upon as such. This website is not intended as a source for legal, accounting or tax advice. Work with your attorney and/or tax professional for additional information.
Marketing and general information about Thrivent Mutual Funds on this website is provided by Thrivent Distributors, LLC, principal underwriter for the Funds.  Thrivent Distributors, LLC is a registered broker-dealer and member of FINRA with its principal place of business at 625 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis, MN 55415

















Nuveen Asset Management LLC Decreases Position in Avon Products, Inc. (AVP)













Сontactos











 Home
/ Negocios
/ Nuveen Asset Management LLC Decreases Position in Avon Products, Inc. (AVP) 



Nuveen Asset Management LLC Decreases Position in Avon Products, Inc. (AVP)

Rai Favela |
Viernes, Julio 28, 2017







(NYSE:AVP) or 64,924 shares.Capwealth Advisors Llc increased Fireeye Inc (FEYE) stake by 75.57% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing.
Shares of Biostage, Inc. Americafirst Capital Management LLC purchased a new stake in Avon Products during the first quarter valued at approximately $689,000. General Dynamics now has $58.31 billion valuation. The stock declined 0.53% or $0.02 reaching $3.73 on the news. About 1.27M shares traded. It has underperformed by 5.29% the S&P500. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, three have given a hold rating and two have assigned a buy rating to the company's stock. UBS maintained the shares of FEYE in report on Friday, May 6 with "Neutral" rating. Citigroup has "Buy" rating and $6 target. Wunderlich maintained FireEye Inc (NASDAQ:FEYE) rating on Wednesday, January 20. As per Thursday, November 5, the company rating was downgraded by UBS. It also reduced Caterpillar Inc (NYSE:CAT) stake by 128,200 shares and now owns 9,400 shares. Gladstone Coml Corp (NASDAQ:GOOD) was raised too.It is down 0.00% since July 26, 2016 and is. Its down 0.01, from 0.96 in 2016Q3. It is positive, as 26 investors sold Avon Products, Inc. shares while 81 reduced holdings. Brandes Partners Limited Partnership reported 160,224 shares or 0.01% of all its holdings. Blair William Il invested in 45,632 shares or 0% of the stock. Renaissance Technologies Ltd Liability holds 610,400 shares. The stock of Avon Products, Inc.About 3,880 shares traded. Bnp Paribas Arbitrage Sa accumulated 59,700 shares. Axa reported 33,200 shares. J Goldman & LP has 34,400 shares for 0.03% of their portfolio. Toronto Dominion Bancshares holds 0% or 400 shares. The institutional investor owned 150,989 shares of the company's stock after selling 86,934 shares during the period. Fincl Partners Capital Mgmt Limited Liability Corporation invested in 137,013 shares. Walleye Trading Limited Co invested in 0% or 5,014 shares. Linden Advsrs Ltd Partnership reported 0.02% in FireEye Inc (NASDAQ:FEYE). Guggenheim Cap Limited Liability Corp reported 630,088 shares stake.02/29/2016 - Avon Products, Inc. had its "outperform" rating reiterated by analysts at Cowen. 77,154 shares valued at $333,583 were sold by Acosta Fernando on Monday, March 13. After having $-0.07 EPS previously, Avon Products, Inc.'s analysts see -171.43% EPS growth. According to Thomson Reuters, sell-side analysts are forecasting a harmony target price of $4.61 on company shares. Therefore 14% are positive. The company was upgraded on Thursday, November 3 by DZ BANK. (NYSE:AVP). State Treasurer State Of Michigan has invested 0.01% in Avon Products, Inc. (NYSE:AVP) has "Neutral" rating given on Tuesday, July 21 by Sterne Agee CRT. The firm has "Buy" rating by Jefferies given on Friday, June 3. The firm has "Hold" rating given on Friday, January 22 by Commerzbank. The rating was maintained by Citigroup with "Neutral" on Monday, September 14. As per Tuesday, April 12, the company rating was downgraded by Piper Jaffray. The firm has "Market Perform" rating by Northland Capital given on Tuesday, November 10.Avon Products (NYSE:AVP) last announced its earnings results on Thursday, May 4th. The stock now has a Market Cap of $1.64B. The Company's divisions include Europe, Middle East & Africa; South Latin America; North Latin America, and Asia Pacific. It has a 59.6 P/E ratio. The Company's product categories are Beauty, and Fashion and Home.Investors sentiment increased to 1.17 in Q4 2016. Its up 4.17, from 0.5 in 2016Q3.Among 10 analysts covering Avon Products Inc. 44 funds opened positions while 81 raised stakes. The company reported ($0.07) EPS for the quarter, missing analysts' consensus estimates of $0.01 by $0.08. Howe & Rusling, a New York-based fund reported 104 shares. Avon Products had a negative return on equity of 3.68% and a net margin of 0.26%. Prudential Financial Inc. increased its stake in shares of Avon Products by 9.6% in the first quarter. (NYSE:AVP). Nj State Employees Deferred Compensation Plan accumulated 0.02% or 15,000 shares. Morgan Stanley reported 30,624 shares or 0% of all its holdings. Equities research analysts anticipate that Avon Products will post $0.22 EPS for the current fiscal year. Skylands Cap Limited Liability Company invested in 0.36% or 13,750 shares. Fifth Third Retail Bank holds 60,296 shares or 0.08% of its portfolio.WARNING: "Nuveen Asset Management LLC Decreases Position in Avon Products, Inc". The stock rose 0.68% or $0.02 reaching $3.72. Cibc World Markets owns 39,169 shares for 0% of their portfolio. Northern Tru holds 0.01% or 6.58M shares. Fiera Capital stated it has 0% in Avon Products, Inc. Thrivent Financial for Lutherans now owns 73,640 shares of the company's stock worth $371,000 after buying an additional 5,910 shares during the last quarter. Citigroup maintained Avon Products, Inc. During the same period past year, the company earned ($0.07) earnings per share. AVP's profit will be $22.04 million for 18.60 P/E if the $0.05 EPS becomes a reality.




Latest News
 

Capital Management Associates NY Maintains Stake in Radian Group Inc. (NYSE:RDN)



Parametrica Management Ltd Invests $357000 in Nu Skin Enterprises, Inc. (NUS)



River, con suplentes, derrotó a un equipo universitario



What Do Analysts Say About United Continental Holdings, Inc. (UAL)



Gilead Sciences, Inc. (NASDAQ:GILD) is Horan Capital Management's 6th Largest Position



Presidente Maduro entregó la vivienda 1.700.00 en Ciudad Tiuna de Caracas



Southwest Airlines Company (NYSE:LUV) Shares Sold by Regentatlantic Capital LLC



Greenleaf Trust Reduces Stake in NuVasive, Inc. (NUVA)



With two billion users, Facebook profits up 71 per cent in Q2



Jefferies Upgrades Rating On McKesson Corporation (MCK)



Moments From GOP's Failed Healthcare Vote



Seattle Genetics, Inc. (SGEN) Shares Sold by Principal Financial Group Inc



El Festival Barenboim comienza con un concierto gratuito en Plaza Vaticano



World Wrestling Entertainment (NYSE:WWE) Receiving Positive News Coverage, Study Shows











Viernes, Julio 28, 2017  





Popular news



SC Seeks BCCI's Reply on E-Auction of IPL Media Rights 
				Swamy had moved the apex court on 11 July, seeking e-auction of media rights for IPL matches. Till 2017 IPL, Sony ESPN was the official broadcaster of the cash rich T20 tournament.


Rooney happy to get Everton homecoming out of way 
				He told EvertonTV: "I hope Thursday is the first of many appearances I make at Goodison Park". We are pleased with that but, of course, there are things we can do a lot better'.


Se dispara precio de petróleo por promesa saudí de recortar exportaciones 
				Sin embargo, el impacto en el mercado ha sido escaso hasta ahora en medio del crecimiento de la producción de los Estados Unidos este año.


Moody's Corporation (MCO) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Barclays PLC 
				Corporate insiders at Moody's Corporation (NYSE:MCO) have decreased their position in the stock by -23.02% over the past 6 months. After all, if insiders are buying stock in their own company, they probably know something that a normal investor does not.


Buffalo Wild Wings, Inc. (NASDAQ:BWLD) Lowered to Equal Weight at Stephens 
				Finally, Norges Bank bought a new stake in shares of Buffalo Wild Wings during the fourth quarter valued at about $21,888,000. The restaurant operator reported $0.66 earnings per share for the quarter, missing the consensus estimate of $1.01 by $0.35.


Here's the World's First All-Electric 'Sport Utility Truck' 
				Bollinger B1 is equipped with an electric engine developing 360 HP and 640 Nm of torque. Unveiled today in the USA the vehicle is described as being a "sport utility truck".


Moisés cuenta las horas para debutar con Puebla 
				Me he encontrado un buen grupo sabemos lo que estamos peleando y no se puede regalar nada" aseguró el jugador colombiano.


Analysts See $-0.22 EPS for K2M Group Holdings Inc (KTWO) 
				On May 3 the stock rating was downgraded to "Market Perform" from "Outperform" in an announcement from Northland Securities. Royal Bank Of Canada reiterated a "buy" rating on shares of K2M Group Holdings in a research note on Wednesday, May 3rd.


Government officially deems Grab and Uber legal: yes, they're dating now 
				But it comes with conditions for the operators, who now need to have an "intermediation business licence" issued by a regulatory body.


Hillary Clinton to release new book 'What Happened' about 2016 election 
				The official book jacket cover for Hillary Clinton's upcoming book " What Happened " is shown in this image released in New York, NY, U.S., July 27, 2017.


Zlatan apes around: I am king, he is Kong 
				A key difference between the two, however, is that the former will, one day, come back to pick up from where he left off. Mourinho's claim suggests Zlatan will return after he has finished rehabbing his knee.


Frontier Developments Rises On Investment From China's Tencent (ALLISS) 
				David Braben, chief executive, said: "Tencent is the market leader in the online games industry in China and operating a premium PC games distribution platform, WeGame".


Rahul slams Nitish for aligning with BJP 
				The RJD leader said his party was consulting legal experts and may approach the Supreme Court, given that the verdict in the S.R.  The JD (U)-BJP combine has submitted to the Governor a list of 132 MLAs and staked claim to form the government in the state.


Trump Designates July 27 as Korean War Armistice Day 
				Through diplomatic engagements led by President Eisenhower, Americans secured peace on the Korean Peninsula. Shortly thereafter, American troops arrived and pushed back the North Koreans.


Australia capture first-ever win over the U.S.  women's national soccer team 
				Not in 27 previous meetings had the Matildas beaten the United States , and not in 12 years had Australia even drawn.  One of Australian sport's longest hoodoos was ended by the Matildas' vibrant and cohesive display in Seattle.







Follow Us









Categories


Mundo


Medicina


Deportes


Tecnología


Espectáculos


Negocios






Recommended stories



Capital Management Associates NY Maintains Stake in Radian Group Inc. (NYSE:RDN)




Parametrica Management Ltd Invests $357000 in Nu Skin Enterprises, Inc. (NUS)




River, con suplentes, derrotó a un equipo universitario




What Do Analysts Say About United Continental Holdings, Inc. (UAL)




Gilead Sciences, Inc. (NASDAQ:GILD) is Horan Capital Management's 6th Largest Position




Presidente Maduro entregó la vivienda 1.700.00 en Ciudad Tiuna de Caracas




Southwest Airlines Company (NYSE:LUV) Shares Sold by Regentatlantic Capital LLC




Greenleaf Trust Reduces Stake in NuVasive, Inc. (NUVA)




With two billion users, Facebook profits up 71 per cent in Q2




Jefferies Upgrades Rating On McKesson Corporation (MCK)




Moments From GOP's Failed Healthcare Vote




Seattle Genetics, Inc. (SGEN) Shares Sold by Principal Financial Group Inc




Adele Climbs U.K. Rich List, Paul McCartney Still On Top




McDonald's, Cinnabon, Hooters offer Tax Day freebies




Flow battery could run for more than 10 years
















Karen L. Larson - Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Karen L. Larson
Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC



Overview
Relationships Paths
Career History 


Karen L. Larson
Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC



 Overview



Notable Companies


Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.




Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 198 people.
              






 Relationships
              See Details




David Charles Francis

Head of Equities at Thrivent Asset Management LLC




Russell W. Swansen

Chief Investment Officer at Thrivent Financial For Lutherans Foundation





Mark Simenstad

Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC




Edward Stuart Dryden

Chief Compliance Officer at Thrivent Financial





Noah John Monsen

Senior Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC




Keith Daniel Gangl

Senior Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Asset Management LLC





Gregory Richard Anderson

Senior Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.




Kent L. White

Director of Investment Grade Research at Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.





Paul J. Ocenasek

Senior Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.




Conrad E. Smith

Senior Portfolio Manager at Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.







See 188 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 188 More 


 


 Paths to Karen L. Larson



            Karen L. Larson          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Karen L. Larson






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Karen L. Larson.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Career History



Portfolio Manager

                                    2011 - Current                


Thrivent Asset Management LLC


                  Thrivent Asset Management offers a broad range of products and services including life insurance, annuities and mutual funds. Investment strategies are designed to meet with clients' Christian values. Their mutual funds offer a wide range of investment options, from all-in-one solutions to a variety of single strategy funds targeting specific markets or industries. Thrivent offers several types of managed account programs designed to meet each client's investment goals, risk tolerance, time horizon, tax situation and preference for how actively they wish to be involved in making investment decisions.Thrivent SELECT Managed Portfolios allow clients to choose from five different risk-based portfolio models, each of which is available for both tax-sensitive and tax-deferred accounts. Portfolios are invested in a variety of proprietary and non-proprietary mutual funds and ETFs that are diversified across multiple asset classes and sectors. Thrivent Income-Focused Managed Portfolios allows clients to choose from two different portfolio series. Series 300 seeks to provide a modest yield, primarily through investing in fixed income funds. Series 700 seeks to provide a more aggressive level of income and risk by investing in both fixed income and dividend paying stock funds. Portfolios are invested in a variety of proprietary and non-proprietary mutual funds and ETFs.  Thrivent Advantage Managed Portfolios allow clients to choose from five different risk-based portfolio models, each of which is available for both tax-sensitive and tax-deferred accounts. Portfolios are invested primarily in Thrivent's proprietary mutual funds, as well as ETFs in certain asset categories, in portfolios that are diversified across multiple asset classes and sectors.                




Vice President, Member & Fieldsupport

                                    Tenure Unconfirmed                


Thrivent Financial


                  We're Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, a faith-based, not-for-profit membership organization nearly 2.5 million members strong. We're a Fortune 500 financial services organization with the strength of more than $75 billion in assets under management.

Our Financials

Being membership-owned, Thrivent Financial does what's best for our members, supporting the values of faith, family, stewardship and service. You'll see it in the ways we help you and your family achieve financial security. You'll feel it in how we help members connect with each other. And you'll be proud of how we help members invest in their communities and congregations.

Our Mission, Vision and Values

For more than a century, our blend of financial expertise, shared values and service to members has set us apart. As the nation's largest fraternal benefit society, we're here solely to help others. Every day, we make a difference through the:

    Financial solutions we offer.
    Member activities we support.
    Resources we provide the Lutheran community and nonprofit organizations.

Membership in Thrivent Financial is all about thriving – strengthening your life and the lives of others.                




Director & President

                                    2013 - Prior                


Thrivent Investment Management, Inc.


                  Thrivent Investment Management invests client assets in a variety of securities, including but not limited to, listed and unlisted stocks, ETF, ETNs, bonds, certain open-end mutual funds (load-waived and no-load), closed-end funds, certain options positions (excluding those that involve the use of margin), commercial paper, certificates of deposit, and municipal securities.                





 Other Affiliations




              Karen L. Larson is affiliated with
                            Thrivent Asset Management LLC, Thrivent Financial, Thrivent Investment Management, Inc..
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















Thrivent Asset Management, LLC                                                                                           - Minneapolis                                       , MN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MN



Minneapolis



Management Investment, Open-End



Management Investment, Open-end



                            Thrivent Asset Management, LLC
                                    



 





















T 


Thrivent Asset Management, LLC                                                                                          
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



625 4TH AVE S MINNEAPOLIS, MN 55415
Get Directions



(612) 340-7215
www.thrivent.com                                                                                        





Business Info



 Founded 2009
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $252,444.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Management Investment, Open-end
 Contacts  







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Thrivent Asset Management, Llc                                                                                           was founded in 2009. Thrivent Asset Management, Llc                                                                                           specializes in Management Investment, Open-end. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







T

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 













Investment Management | Thrivent Financial














Skip Navigation








 Log in




Site Maintenance Alert


Search
Search



Search








CloseBusiness Accounts Log In
Please select one of the following business account types.



Mutual Funds-Trust >
Trust Services>
Brokerage-Business >
Mutual Funds-Business >
Cancel




 Menu






Share
Print
Email to friend








Close




Share with a Friend


T.COM-Y.8

Close






Close




Share with a Friend
Use your favorite social media site:

 

T.COM-R.6

Close






Home
Products
Investments




Investments








Whether you are a savvy investor or  just starting out, it's important to invest wisely, prudently and with help from a professional.
				  
Why invest with Thrivent? We have professional money managers to take care of your funds and we  have more than $116.5 billion in assets under advisement.1 Start your investment  journey with us as your guide. 







Take the next step. Let's Connect.









* Indicates required field

* First Name:



* Last Name:


* How would you like us to contact you?
 By Email     By Phone



* Email:

Format: example@test.com




* Phone:

Format: xxx-xxx-xxxx


Next 









* Indicates required field
Please provide your address and ZIP code to ensure we can connect you with your local Thrivent Financial representative.

* Street:

Format: 123 Main St.


* ZIP Code:










 Back     


	Testing one two three















Investments we offer

Stocks
Mutual funds
Taxable and tax-exempt bonds
Exchange-traded funds (ETFs)
Closed-end funds
Preferred stocks
Convertible securities









7 Investment terms to know
Investing has a language all its own. Do you ever wonder what a mutual fund, ETF, preferred stock or tax-exempt bond is? If so, here's a quick overview of seven basic investing terms that may be unfamiliar to you.

								Yes, take me there 













Programs we offer
Investing is a journey that starts with a holistic, customized strategy – something our financial representatives specialize in. They'll help you choose from a range of investment options – including mutual funds and managed accounts – to build a diversified portfolio specific to your unique goals and preferences.



Mutual funds



Thrivent Mutual Funds spread your risk across various investments, and are managed by investment  professionals. In addition to diversification and professional money  management, mutual funds offer liquidity, which means you can access your  assets at any time. 





Retail brokerage accounts 



Thrivent retail brokerage accounts let you expand your portfolio by investing directly in individual stocks, bonds or a wider range of mutual funds. Certain Thrivent Representatives may limit their offerings to mutual funds within the retail brokerage account. In any case, you have access to hundreds of investments; you make all investment decisions. You pay a commission or sales charge on each transaction.



Managed Account Programs
Our Managed Account programs provide ongoing investment advice – along with personalized service – to help keep you on track with your investment goals. These programs vary, allowing you to choose how involved you want to be with investment decisions. The annual fee is determined based on a percentage of your assets and aligned to the level of service that is right for you.



 Shepherd Managed Portfolios (Vanguard ETF)2



Thrivent Shepherd Managed Portfolios combine four decades of indexing expertise with Vanguard's low cost exchange-traded funds (ETFs).  You choose from a series of well-diversified portfolios managed by Vanguard's Investment Strategy Group.





 Genesis Managed Portfolios2



With this program you gain access to portfolios constructed by BlackRock's Model Portfolio Solutions team composed of cost-effective iShares ETFs.  A pioneer in ETF portfolio construction, BlackRock takes a more tactical approach to investing by strategically crafting their allocations to identify the best investment opportunities.





 SELECT Managed Portfolios2



SELECT Managed Portfolios are actively managed byThrivent Asset Management personnel and offer tax-deferred or tax-sensitive options consisting of mutual funds and exchange-traded funds (ETFs).  These portfolios are designed with a range of investment styles to help you meet your financial goals as they grow and change.





 Income-Focused Managed Portfolios2



The Thrivent Income-Focused Managed Portfolio offers two model portfolios managed by Thrivent Asset Management personnel; each with two distribution options. One model distributes all interest, dividends and capital gains to clients at intervals they choose. The other automatically reinvests all income back into the account. Each model is built using a variety of asset classes, investment styles and a combination of actively managed mutual funds and exchange-traded funds. 





 Advisor Program2



Thrivent Advisor Program lets you work with your Thrivent Financial Representative to build a portfolio using a variety of investments, including mutual funds, stocks, bonds, options, unit investment trusts and exchange-traded funds. While your Thrivent Financial Representative will provide ongoing guidance and help manage your assets, you are empowered to make all the investment decisions. 





 Thrivent AdvisorFlex Managed Variable Annuity Program2



Thrivent AdvisorFlex Managed Variable Annuity Program combines the benefits of having a flexible premium deferred variable annuity with the personalized service of an advisory program.  You’ll have the option to choose from a variety of sub account investment options.





 Advisor Guided Program



Thrivent Advisor Guided Program is a discretionary investment advisory program. This means your financial representative develops an agreed-upon asset allocation strategy or model portfolio using a variety of investments, including mutual funds, stocks, bonds, options, unit investment trusts and exchange-traded funds (ETFs). Your financial representative buys, sells or effects transactions in your account, which may include adjusting the strategy or model account portfolio. 





 Separately Managed Accounts2



Thrivent Separately Managed Accounts give you access to investment advisory services provided by select third-party money managers. You benefit from their experience and receive an investment strategy designed to achieve your investment objectives, taking into account your goals and risk management requirements.





 Unified Managed Accounts2



Thrivent Unified Managed Accounts bring together all investment services.  Your Thrivent Financial representative will analyze your investment objectives and provide recommendations as to how you can effectively allocate your account assets among the available third-party money managers, mutual funds and ETF options. By centralizing your assets within this program, you'll be assured your investments are coordinated under one investment strategy.















Wall Street to Your Street: Market commentary and insights from Thrivent Asset Management leaders.
Learn more 



 












Related Items








The first rule of investing: Just do it
What does it take to achieve your long-term investment goals? Find out what may be even more important than how you invest. 
Learn more










Keep summer carefree; go paperless
Don't worry about what's in your mailbox. Go paperless and access your account conveniently and securely. 
Get started









Market Snapshot














Securities and investment advisory services are offered through Thrivent Investment Management Inc., 625 Fourth Ave. S., Minneapolis, MN 55415, a FINRA and SIPC member and a wholly owned subsidiary of Thrivent Financial, the marketing name of Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, Appleton, Wisconsin. Thrivent Financial representatives are registered representatives of Thrivent Investment Management Inc. They are also licensed insurance agents/producers of Thrivent.
Shares may be worth more or less than their original value when redeemed.
All investing involves risks, including the possible loss of principal. The mutual fund prospectus and managed account program brochure contain more complete information on the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the investment, which investors should read and consider carefully before investing. Prospectuses and managed account program brochures are available from a Thrivent Financial representative.
Fee-based investment advisory services are available through qualified investment advisor representatives only. Thrivent Investment Management Inc. is the sponsoring investment adviser of the Managed Account Programs offered through National Financial's Managed Account Solutions service, provided by Envestnet Asset Management, Inc., a third-party provider of investment management services. Security transactions are handled by National Financial Services LLC, a Fidelity Investments® Company, a registered broker-dealer and a member of New York Stock Exchange and SIPC. National Financial Services, Envestnet Asset Management and Thrivent Investment Management Inc. are not affiliated. 
1 As of Dec. 31, 2016. 
2 Your Thrivent Financial representative does not have discretionary trading authority over your account.
T.COM-D.4












Close



Leaving Thrivent Financial

Any data or personal information collected by websites other than Thrivent is not covered by Thrivent's privacy policy. We recommend you read the privacy policies of those sites as they may be different from Thrivent's policy.















































Thrivent Asset Management, LLC | Wealthminder











































Thrivent Asset Management, LLC


Thrivent Asset Management, LLC
(CRD# 137751) is a financial advisory firm headquartered in
Minneapolis, MN.
They
manage $16,350,526,166 in 21 accounts and
serve the financial needs of clients across 2 states (or territories).




Current Firm Details



Thrivent Asset Management, LLC




625 Fourth Avenue South,
Minneapolis,
MN
55415
800-847-4836
https://www.thrivent.com




https://www.thrivent.com







By the Numbers






Total Assets Under Management

16,351
MILLION



Total Number of Accounts

21
ACCOUNTS



Average Account Value

$778,596,484







Compensation Options




A percentage of assets under your management






Advisory Services Offered




Portfolio management for investment companies (as well as "business development companies")








Types of Clients










Registered States






Registered Investment Advisor


Advisors affiliated with a RIA are permitted to work with up to five clients in nearly-all states* without explicit registration. The map below shows states where this firm has explicit registration only.




MN, WI






Financial Advisors at Thrivent Asset Management, LLC








No Advisor Found.








Our primary data source is public filings of Form ADV as published by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and made available in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). Supplementary information may be provided by listed advisors or their representatives.
Because many firms provide a variety of products or services, an individual may or may not be registered to operate under all services provided by the firm.Do not rely solely on the information on this page. The information may be inaccurate, incomplete or outdated. For the most accurate and up-to-date information, please search for the firm or individual on the SEC site at
http://www.adviserinfo.sec.gov/IAPD/Content/Search/iapd_Search.aspx







Ready to hire a financial advisor?

Get competitive proposals from multiple advisors.

















Request Proposals























Timeout!



You have been idle and will be logged out in

seconds.


Stay Logged In
Log Out Now

















Thrivent Income Fund – Class S | Thrivent Mutual Funds














































Skip to main content














Fixed Income Funds
Thrivent Income Fund(LBIIX)

You own shares of this fund

Class S - Available for purchase
 Class A - Not available from ThriventFunds.com




Class
Mutual Funds may offer different "classes" of shares. Classes indicate the type and number of fees or expenses an investor can expect to pay for shares in a fund.
Class S
These are no-load funds, meaning there are no front-end or back-end sales charges to purchase or sell shares. Prior to February 1, 2016, Class S shares were named Institutional Shares.
Class A
These are front-end load funds, and they are not available for purchase on ThriventFunds.com. You may be eligible to purchase these shares if you work with a financial representative. If you work with a financial representative and already own Class A shares, please contact your financial representative.

            ?
        




Class
Mutual Funds may offer different "classes" of shares. Classes indicate the type and number of fees or expenses an investor can expect to pay for shares in a fund.
Class S
These are no-load funds, meaning there are no front-end or back-end sales charges to purchase or sell shares. Prior to February 1, 2016, Class S shares were named Institutional Shares.
Class A
These are front-end load funds, and they are not available for purchase on ThriventFunds.com. You may be eligible to purchase these shares if you work with a financial representative. If you work with a financial representative and already own Class A shares, please contact your financial representative.





BUY FUNDS
BUY MORE SHARES

PROSPECTUS & FUND DOCUMENTS
FUND FACTS (PDF)










Growth of $10,000



(as of 06/30/2017)
A look at this fund’s performance over the past 10 years or since the fund's inception (if less than 10 years), based on how an initial $10,000 investment would have changed over time.  Performance shown assumes the reinvest of all dividends and capital gains.  Performance of other share classes will vary from the results shown based on differences in sales charges and expenses. 

            ?
        




(as of 06/30/2017)
A look at this fund’s performance over the past 10 years or since the fund's inception (if less than 10 years), based on how an initial $10,000 investment would have changed over time.  Performance shown assumes the reinvest of all dividends and capital gains.  Performance of other share classes will vary from the results shown based on differences in sales charges and expenses. 





Growth of $10,000


Year
Value




2007
10,237.87


2008
9,082.67


2009
11,069.01


2010
12,393.15


2011
13,116.72


2012
14,606.93


2013
14,605.51


2014
15,607.69


2015
15,506


2016
16,475.85







Risk Potential


Risk Potential
The potential for risk within the Thrivent Mutual Funds has been categorized into five levels: Conservative, Moderately Conservative, Moderate, Moderately Aggressive, and Aggressive, ranging from lower risk potential to higher risk potential. Funds on the lower risk portion of the scale (Conservative, Moderately Conservative) are expected to have a lower degree of volatility and price fluctuations while those on the higher risk portion of the scale (Aggressive, Moderately Aggressive) are expected to have a higher degree of volatility and price fluctuations.

            ?
        




Risk Potential
The potential for risk within the Thrivent Mutual Funds has been categorized into five levels: Conservative, Moderately Conservative, Moderate, Moderately Aggressive, and Aggressive, ranging from lower risk potential to higher risk potential. Funds on the lower risk portion of the scale (Conservative, Moderately Conservative) are expected to have a lower degree of volatility and price fluctuations while those on the higher risk portion of the scale (Aggressive, Moderately Aggressive) are expected to have a higher degree of volatility and price fluctuations.









Moderately Conservative





Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box


Thrivent Income Fund appeared as a medium credit quality, moderate interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more

            ?
        




Thrivent Income Fund appeared as a medium credit quality, moderate interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more





This fund's investment style is moderate duration, medium quality



Interest Rate Sensitivity:
 Moderate
Credit Quality:
 Medium













COMPARE TO OTHER FUNDS


Fund Highlights



Net Asset Value
The NAV is the fund’s value or price per share. The NAV is calculated by dividing the market value of all the fund’s shares (minus its liabilities) by the number of issued shares.
Daily NAV Change 
The daily NAV change is the difference between the fund’s current price per share and its price at the time of market close on the prior day.
Returns
Returns are calculated on a calendar-year and year-to-date basis. The total return includes both the fund’s increase in value and dividends. 
Net Annual Fund Operating Expenses
This figure represents the total percentage of a mutual fund’s assets used to maintain the fund, including operating expenses and management fees. It’s calculated by dividing the fund’s annual net operating expenses by the average dollar value of its assets, and includes the impact of any fee waivers or expense reimbursements that may have been in effect during the time period.
Sales Charges 
The commission paid by an investor upon investment in a fund.

            ?
        




Net Asset Value
The NAV is the fund’s value or price per share. The NAV is calculated by dividing the market value of all the fund’s shares (minus its liabilities) by the number of issued shares.
Daily NAV Change 
The daily NAV change is the difference between the fund’s current price per share and its price at the time of market close on the prior day.
Returns
Returns are calculated on a calendar-year and year-to-date basis. The total return includes both the fund’s increase in value and dividends. 
Net Annual Fund Operating Expenses
This figure represents the total percentage of a mutual fund’s assets used to maintain the fund, including operating expenses and management fees. It’s calculated by dividing the fund’s annual net operating expenses by the average dollar value of its assets, and includes the impact of any fee waivers or expense reimbursements that may have been in effect during the time period.
Sales Charges 
The commission paid by an investor upon investment in a fund.


( as of  )

Net Asset Value
N/A



Daily NAV Change
N/A

( as of 06/30/2017 )

Year to Date Return
3.83%



1 Year Return
3.22%



Net Annual Fund Operating Expenses
0.44%




Sales Charge
None





                Get More Performance Info
            








Fund Overview



Description
Strategy
Risk



Thrivent Income Fund seeks high current income while preserving principal. The fund's secondary investment objective is to obtain long-term growth of capital in order to maintain investor's purchasing power.
This fund invests primarily in investment-grade corporate bonds, government bonds, asset-backed securities, and mortgage-backed securities. The fund may also invest a portion of its assets in high yield bonds, leveraged loans and preferred stock, and may opportunistically invest in foreign issuers, non-agency mortgage-backed securities and commercial mortgage-backed securities. The fund typically has its largest allocation in BBB-rated bonds, which are the lowest-tier of investment grade bonds.


The portfolio management team seeks to add value through security selection and active management, and monitors risk in an effort to build a well-diversified portfolio. The team uses fundamental, quantitative and technical investment research techniques to determine which securities to buy and sell. The fund’s investment advisor may purchase bonds of any maturity and generally focuses on U.S. companies that it believes are financially sound and have strong cash flows and earnings. The team also considers the macro-economic environment and performs an ongoing assessment of relative value and risk. Based on this market outlook, the Fund may take overweight and underweight positions in various sectors and industries and may reallocate across the higher and lower-quality segments of the bond market. The Thrivent Mutual Funds fixed income analysts perform research and provide buy/sell recommendations while the portfolio manager is responsible for portfolio construction and risk management.


The Fund primarily invests in investment-grade corporate bonds, government bonds, asset-backed securities and mortgage-backed securities. The value of the Fund is influenced by factors impacting the overall market, certain asset classes, certain investment styles, and specific issuers. The Fund may incur losses due to incorrect assessments of investments by its investment adviser. Bond prices generally fall as interest rates rise. Credit risk is the risk that an issuer of a debt security may not pay its debt, and high yield securities are subject to increased credit risk as well as liquidity risk. The value of mortgage-related and other asset-backed securities will be influenced by the factors affecting the housing market and the assets underlying such securities. Foreign investments involve additional risks, including currency fluctuations, liquidity, political, economic and market instability, and different legal and accounting standards. The prices of futures contracts can be highly volatile and the loss from investing in them can exceed the initial investment. Dealer inventories of bonds are at or near historic lows in relation to market size, which has the potential to decrease liquidity and increase price volatility in the fixed income markets. To the extent that the financials sector continues to represent a significant portion of the Fund, the Fund will be sensitive to changes in, and its performance may depend to a greater extent on, factors impacting this sector.


… View More
 View Less



Buy Funds



Who Should Consider Investing?

The Fund may be suitable for investors who:
Seek a high level of income while preserving principalHave a medium to long-term investment time horizon and a moderately conservative risk toleranceAre able to withstand a low to moderate level of risk and volatility in pursuit of commensurate long-term returns






Fund Management




Fund Management
Our seasoned team of more than 100 investment professionals brings their deep expertise to managing each fund so you can feel confident in the choices you’re making. More than 85% have at least 10 years of experience, nearly half have more than 20 years of investment experience, and 85% have earned the Chartered Financial Analyst designation, an advanced degree, or both.







Stephen D. Lowe, CFA
Head of Fixed Income
View Full Bio





Kent L. White, CFA
Senior Portfolio Manager
View Full Bio











Fund Details



Performance




Holdings




Risk & Volatility




Yields, Distributions & Prices




Morningstar




Fees & Expenses














Other Funds





Compare

Fixed Income
Thrivent High Yield Fund
Pursues income by investing in higher yielding, higher risk bonds


Risk Potential





Moderate


Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box



Thrivent High Yield Fund appeared as a low credit quality, limited interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more

            ?
        




Thrivent High Yield Fund appeared as a low credit quality, limited interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more




This fund's investment style is limited duration, low quality

Fund Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box




Interest Rate Sensitivity:
 Limited
Credit Quality:
 Low





Buy Now






Compare

Income Plus
Thrivent Opportunity Income Plus Fund
Primarily pursues income by investing predominantly in bonds


Risk Potential





Moderately Conservative


Target Allocation





Fund Target Allocation





Equities
5%



Fixed Income
95%





Buy Now






Compare

Fixed Income
Thrivent Municipal Bond Fund
Pursues income by investing in municipal bonds that are mostly federally tax-exempt


Risk Potential





Moderately Conservative


Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box





Fund Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box









Buy Now






Compare

Fixed Income
Thrivent Limited Maturity Bond Fund
Pursues income consistent with reasonable stability by investing in high quality short-term bonds


Risk Potential





Conservative


Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box



Thrivent Limited Maturity Bond Fund appeared as a medium credit quality, limited interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more

            ?
        




Thrivent Limited Maturity Bond Fund appeared as a medium credit quality, limited interest rate sensitivity fund on the Morningstar Style Box™ as of 4/30/2017.
Learn more




This fund's investment style is limited duration, medium quality

Fund Morningstar Fixed Income Style Box




Interest Rate Sensitivity:
 Limited
Credit Quality:
 Medium





Buy Now









View All Funds





fund-details


EMAIL











Mutual Funds



Asset Allocation


Income Plus


Equity


Fixed Income


Fund Literature







Accounts



Retirement


Rollovers


General Investment


Kids


Business & Organization







Insights



Market Update


Retirement


Education


Mutual Funds 101


Investing Essentials







About Us



In The News


Getting to Know Us


Investing Your Way


How We Give Back


Leadership Team


Our Fund Managers







Support



FAQs


Tax Resources


Forms


Advisors







Thrivent Financial



Find a Financial Representative


Thrivent.com









Facebook

LinkedIn





Privacy & Security
Thrivent Mutual Funds © 2017. All Rights Reserved.



Call us. We're here to help. 1-800-847-4836 
Monday through Friday: 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. Central time.



 Check the background of Thrivent Distributors, LLC on FINRA's BrokerCheck.
Investing in a mutual fund involves risks, including the possible loss of principal. The prospectus and summary prospectus contain more complete information on the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the fund, and other information, which investors should read and consider carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available at ThriventFunds.com or by calling 1-800-847-4836.
This website is not intended as a source for legal, accounting or tax advice or services. Work with your attorney and/or tax professional for additional information.
The principal underwriter for the Thrivent Mutual Funds is Thrivent Distributors, LLC. No communication or content, including investment analysis tools and information about the Thrivent Mutual Funds, on this website is intended to provide investment advice or recommendations of any kind and may not be relied upon as such. The communication and content found on this website, including investment analysis tools and information about the Thrivent Mutual Funds, are not intended as a solicitation to buy or an offer to sell any security. Thrivent Distributors, LLC has undertaken no review of the individual circumstances of any investor and makes no representations with respect to the suitability of any investment for a particular investor. Any purchase, sale or redemption of the Thrivent Mutual Funds will be executed through Thrivent Financial Investor Services Inc., the transfer agent for the Thrivent Mutual Funds, and an affiliate of Thrivent Distributors, LLC. Asset management services provided by Thrivent Asset Management, LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, Appleton, WI.
Thrivent Distributors, LLC is a registered broker-dealer and member of FINRA with its principal place of business at 625 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis, MN 55415
Thrivent Financial Investor Services, Inc. (TFISI) is the transfer agent for Thrivent Mutual Funds and maintains and services shareholder accounts.  Pages on this website that include information about shareholder accounts are supported by the transfer agent.  
No communication or content on this website is intended to provide investment advice or recommendations of any kind and may not be relied upon as such. This website is not intended as a source for legal, accounting or tax advice. Work with your attorney and/or tax professional for additional information.
Marketing and general information about Thrivent Mutual Funds on this website is provided by Thrivent Distributors, LLC, principal underwriter for the Funds.  Thrivent Distributors, LLC is a registered broker-dealer and member of FINRA with its principal place of business at 625 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis, MN 55415














	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































